District of Columbia statutes.
38-1204.05

Transfer of appropriation balance; power to contract; Material Fund.

(a)

The Board of Education of the District of Columbia is authorized to transfer during the fiscal year any appropriation balance available for one item of appropriation to another item of appropriation or to a new program designated by action of the Board; provided, that any such action under this subsection shall be taken in accordance with the reprogramming policy and laws of the District of Columbia.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

There is established, in the General Fund, an account entitled the Material Fund which shall be limited to public school use. The Board of Education is authorized to transfer its authority from the Material Fund to an internal service fund, which transferred authority if not obligated by the end of the first quarter of fiscal year 1981, or each succeeding fiscal year thereafter, shall expire.

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1430, Pub. L. 93-471, title IV, § 405
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 5, 22 DCR 2934
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3204(b), 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 22, 1980, D.C. Law 3-82, §§ 3(c), 27 DCR 2647
May 23, 1990, D.C. Law 8-131, § 2, 37 DCR 2211
June 22, 1990, D.C. Law 8-143, § 2, 37 DCR 2972
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 314(c), 44 DCR 1423
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 706, 47 DCR 6308
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 31-1535.
1973 Ed., § 31-1735.
D.C. Law 13-172 deleted former subsec. (b) providing: “Except as provided in § 1-336 § 1-301.91, 2001 Ed., the Office of Contracting and Procurement shall contract on behalf of the Board of Education for procurement of goods or services necessary for the performance of Board of Education functions.”
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 706 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 706 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).